Illinois, session 104th, SB4195.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6)7    Sec. 110-6. Revocation of pretrial release, modification 8of conditions of pretrial release, and sanctions for 9violations of conditions of pretrial release. 10    (a) When a defendant has previously been granted pretrial 11release under this Section for a felony or Class A 12misdemeanor, that pretrial release may be revoked only if the 13defendant is charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor that 14is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's pretrial 15release after a hearing on the court's own motion or upon the 16filing of a verified petition by the State.17    When a defendant released pretrial is charged with a 18violation of a protective order or was previously convicted of 19a violation of a protective order and the subject of the 20protective order is the same person as the victim in the 21current underlying matter, the State shall file a verified 22petition seeking revocation of pretrial release. 23    Upon the filing of a petition or upon motion of the court   SB4195- 2 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1seeking revocation, the court shall order the transfer of the 2defendant and the petition or motion to the court before which 3the previous felony or Class A misdemeanor is pending. The 4defendant may be held in custody pending transfer to and a 5hearing before such court. The defendant shall be transferred 6to the court before which the previous matter is pending 7without unnecessary delay, and the revocation hearing shall 8occur within 72 hours of the filing of the State's petition or 9the court's motion for revocation. 10    A hearing at which pretrial release may be revoked must be 11conducted in person (and not by way of two-way audio-visual 12communication) unless the accused waives the right to be 13present physically in court, the court determines that the 14physical health and safety of any person necessary to the 15proceedings would be endangered by appearing in court, or the 16chief judge of the circuit orders use of that system due to 17operational challenges in conducting the hearing in person. 18Such operational challenges must be documented and approved by 19the chief judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the 20challenges through reasonable efforts must be presented and 21approved by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts 22every 6 months. 23    The court before which the previous felony matter or Class 24A misdemeanor is pending may revoke the defendant's pretrial 25release after a hearing. During the hearing for revocation, 26the defendant shall be represented by counsel and have an   SB4195- 3 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1opportunity to be heard regarding the violation and evidence 2in mitigation. The court shall consider all relevant 3circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature and 4seriousness of the violation or criminal act alleged. The 5State shall bear the burden of proving, by clear and 6convincing evidence, that no condition or combination of 7conditions of release would reasonably ensure the appearance 8of the defendant for later hearings or prevent the defendant 9from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class A 10misdemeanor. 11    In lieu of revocation, the court may release the defendant 12pre-trial, with or without modification of conditions of 13pretrial release.14    If the case that caused the revocation is dismissed, the 15defendant is found not guilty in the case causing the 16revocation, or the defendant completes a lawfully imposed 17sentence on the case causing the revocation, the court shall, 18without unnecessary delay, hold a hearing on conditions of 19pretrial release pursuant to Section 110-5 and release the 20defendant with or without modification of conditions of 21pretrial release.22    Both the State and the defendant may appeal an order 23revoking pretrial release or denying a petition for revocation 24of release.25    (a-5) When a defendant has previously been granted 26pretrial release under this Section for a felony or Class A   SB4195- 4 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1misdemeanor and has been placed on electronic monitoring as a 2condition of release, that pretrial release shall be revoked 3upon a finding of probable cause that the defendant has 4committed a felony that is alleged to have occurred during the 5defendant's pretrial release after a hearing on the court's 6own motion or upon the filing of a verified petition by the 7State. Pretrial detention shall continue pending resolution of 8the defendant's charges. 9    (b) If a defendant previously has been granted pretrial 10release under this Section for a Class B or Class C misdemeanor 11offense, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 12violation and if the defendant is subsequently charged with a 13felony that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 14pretrial release or a Class A misdemeanor offense that is 15alleged to have occurred during the defendant's pretrial 16release, such pretrial release may not be revoked, but the 17court may impose sanctions under subsection (c). 18    (c) The court shall follow the procedures set forth in 19Section 110-3 to ensure the defendant's appearance in court if 20the defendant:21        (1) fails to appear in court as required by the 22    defendant's conditions of release;23        (2) is charged with a felony or Class A misdemeanor 24    offense that is alleged to have occurred during the 25    defendant's pretrial release after having been previously 26    granted pretrial release for a Class B or Class C   SB4195- 5 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1    misdemeanor, a petty or business offense, or an ordinance 2    violation that is alleged to have occurred during the 3    defendant's pretrial release;4        (3) is charged with a Class B or C misdemeanor 5    offense, petty or business offense, or ordinance violation 6    that is alleged to have occurred during the defendant's 7    pretrial release; or 8        (4) violates any other condition of pretrial release 9    set by the court. 10    In response to a violation described in this subsection, 11the court may issue a warrant specifying that the defendant 12must appear before the court for a hearing for sanctions and 13may not be released by law enforcement before that appearance. 14    (d) When a defendant appears in court pursuant to a 15summons or warrant issued in accordance with Section 110-3 or 16after being arrested for an offense that is alleged to have 17occurred during the defendant's pretrial release, the State 18may file a verified petition requesting a hearing for 19sanctions.20    (e) During the hearing for sanctions, the defendant shall 21be represented by counsel and have an opportunity to be heard 22regarding the violation and evidence in mitigation. The State 23shall bear the burden of proving by clear and convincing 24evidence that:25        (1) the defendant committed an act that violated a 26    term of the defendant's pretrial release;  SB4195- 6 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1        (2) the defendant had actual knowledge that the 2    defendant's action would violate a court order;3        (3) the violation of the court order was willful; and4        (4) the violation was not caused by a lack of access to 5    financial monetary resources.6    (f) Sanctions for violations of pretrial release may 7include:8        (1) a verbal or written admonishment from the court;9        (2) imprisonment in the county jail for a period not 10    exceeding 30 days;11        (3) (Blank); or12        (4) a modification of the defendant's pretrial 13    conditions.14    (g) The court may, at any time, after motion by either 15party or on its own motion, remove previously set conditions 16of pretrial release, subject to the provisions in this 17subsection. The court may only add or increase conditions of 18pretrial release at a hearing under this Section.19    The court shall not remove a previously set condition of 20pretrial release regulating contact with a victim or witness 21in the case, unless the subject of the condition has been given 22notice of the hearing as required in paragraph (1) of 23subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime Victims 24and Witnesses Act. If the subject of the condition of release 25is not present, the court shall follow the procedures of 26paragraph (10) of subsection (c-1) of the Rights of Crime   SB4195- 7 -LRB104 21673 RLC 37226 b1Victims and Witnesses Act.2    (h) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 3Attorney's office of all hearings under this Section as 4required in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of 5the Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be 6informed of their opportunity at these hearings to obtain a 7protective order.8    (i) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit 9the State's ability to file a verified petition seeking denial 10of pretrial release under subsection (a) of Section 110-6.1 or 11subdivision (d)(2) of Section 110-6.1.12    (j) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant before 13the court, the judge must find that continued detention under 14this Section is necessary to reasonably ensure the appearance 15of the defendant for later hearings or to prevent the 16defendant from being charged with a subsequent felony or Class 17A misdemeanor. This provision does not apply to a defendant 18whose pretrial release has been revoked pursuant to subsection 19(a-5). 20(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1104, eff. 1-1-23.)